Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-710
Telephone lines; liability; cost of removal.

Any owner of any telephone line failing to move its lines, poles, or anchors located near a public highway in accordance with the notice provided by section 86-708 shall be liable to the county or township for the cost of relocating such lines, poles, or anchors. When an owner of such facilities located on private right-of-way is required to move such lines, poles, or anchors, it shall be at the expense of the county or township. The county or township shall be liable to the owner of any telephone line for loss of use of such line for failure to give the notice required by sections 86-708 and 86-709.

Laws 1957, c. 400, § 3, p. 1369;

Laws 1971, LB 328, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-336;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 415.